Illinois, session 104th, HB5289.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 527-517 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27-517 new)7    Sec. 27-517. Civic engagement education. Beginning with 8the 2027-2028 school year, every public high school shall 9include in its curriculum a unit of instruction on civic 10engagement. As part of the unit of instruction, students must 11attend an open meeting of the governing body of a special 12district, the corporate authorities of a municipality, the 13township board of a township, the county board of a county, or 14any similar governing or legislating body of a unit of 15government. If physical attendance at such a meeting is not 16feasible, then attendance may be virtual.